Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.710

Consolidated mail service—Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this section and RCW 43.19.715.

(1) "Consolidated mail service" means incoming, outgoing, and internal mail processing.

(2) "Incoming mail" means mail, packages, or similar items received by an agency, through the United States postal service, private carrier services, or other courier services.

(3) "Internal mail" means interagency mail, packages, or similar items that are delivered or to be delivered to a state agency, the legislature, the supreme court, or the court of appeals, and their officers and employees.

(4) "Outgoing mail" means mail, packages, or similar items processed for agencies to be sent through the United States postal service, private carrier services, or other courier services.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 243; 1993 c 219 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—1993 c 219: "It is the intent of the legislature to consolidate mail functions for state government in a manner that will provide timely, effective, efficient, and less-costly mail service for state government." [ 1993 c 219 s 1.]

Effective date—1993 c 219: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1993 c 219 s 6.]